Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
HEALTH SURVEILLANCE

§324-31 Identity of persons studied and
material, restrictions. The identity, or any group of facts or any system
of records which may lead to the identity, of any person whose condition or
treatment has been studied shall be confidential and shall not be revealed in
any report, release, or publication. The department of health may, however,
use the names of persons when requesting additional information; provided that
approval shall first be obtained from the individual, the individual's parents
or guardian in the case of a minor, or the next of kin in the case of a
deceased person; and provided that the identity or facts identifying the person
shall not be released outside of the department of health. [L 1977, c 117, pt of
§1]

Revision Note

Subsection designation deleted.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next